Washington statutes.
RCW 18.310.020

Powers and duties of director.

The director shall:

(1) Adopt rules to implement this chapter;

(2) Establish appropriate administrative procedures for the processing of the applications;

(3) Issue licenses to qualified companies under the provisions of this chapter;

(4) Maintain a roster of the names and addresses of companies licensed under this chapter;

(5) Employ professional, clerical, and technical assistance as may be necessary to properly administer the work of the director;

(6) Establish forms necessary to administer this chapter;

(7) Oversee the performance of any background investigations;

(8) Initiate and oversee investigations and any audits;

(9) Establish grounds for disciplinary actions;

(10) Adopt fees under RCW 43.24.086; and

(11) Do all other things necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter and comply with the requirements of any pertinent federal laws pertaining to appraisal management companies.

[ 2010 c 179 s 2.]